North Carolina, session 2025, HB1240.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.1. Section 5 of Article VI of the North Carolina Constitution reads as
rewritten:
"Sec. 5. Elections by people and General Assembly.
(1) All elections by the people shall be by ballot, and all elections by the General
Assembly shall be viva voce. A contested election for any office established by Article III of this
Constitution shall be determined by joint ballot of both houses of the General Assembly in the
manner prescribed by law.
(2) For all primary and general elections conducted in even-numbered years, a voter shall
have the right to early vote by casting a ballot in person prior to election day. The General
Assembly may appropriate funds for county boards of elections to use in support of
administration of early voting. To ensure that voters can exercise the right to early vote, county
boards of elections shall do the following:
(a) Designate a minimum of 14 days prior to election day for early voting, select
early voting site locations, and determine staffing needs and hours for each
site subject to the following minimum requirements:
1. On weekdays, all early voting sites shall operate uniformly and shall
be open and operate continuously from at least 8:00 A.M. until at least
7:30 P.M., unless a county board of elections determines that the voter
demand allows for closure at 6:00 P.M.
2. If a Sunday is selected as a day for early voting, all sites operating on
that Sunday shall open and close at the same times.
3. All early voting sites shall be open on the last Saturday prior to election
day from at least 8:00 A.M. until at least 3:00 P.M.
(b) Increase the staffing, hours, number, and locations for early voting sites to
match the needs of voters during the days designated for early voting.
(c) Provide the opportunity for any individual qualified to register to vote to both
register and vote on the same day at any early voting site."
SECTION 1.2. The amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act shall be submitted
to the qualified voters of the State at the statewide general election to be held on November 3,
*H1240-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
2026, which election shall be conducted in accordance with the laws governing elections at that
time. The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional Amendment to do the following:
(1) Guarantee voters a minimum of 14 days for early voting in primary and
general elections.
(2) Ensure that early voting sites are open for a designated minimum number of
hours.
(3) Authorize county boards of elections to establish sites, hours, and staffing for
early voting.
(4) Guarantee same-day registration during early voting so that individuals
qualified to register to vote can both register and vote during early voting."
SECTION 1.3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the
referendum conducted under Section 1.2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question
are in favor of the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll
the amendment among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the
question are against the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the amendment shall have
no effect.
SECTION 1.4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section
1.3 of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment
set out in Section 1.1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1.1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 2. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 House Bill 1240-First Edition